Washington statutes.
RCW 24.24.070

Control of business—Officers.

The management and control of the business and property of such corporation shall be fixed in said board of trustees or board of directors, as the case may be. Said trustees or directors shall elect from their own number at each annual meeting of the corporation a president, vice president, secretary and treasurer, who shall perform the duties of their respective office in accordance with the bylaws of the corporation and the rules and regulations prescribed by the board of trustees or board of directors.

[ 1927 c 190 s 7; RRS s 3887-7.]